Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.778

Budget calculation—New enrollments—Funding level—Inflation factor.

It is the policy of the state of Washington that, for new enrollments provided under RCW 28B.10.776, the essential requirements level budget calculation for those enrollments shall, each biennium, at a minimum, include a funding level per full-time equivalent student that is equal to the rate assumed in the omnibus appropriations act for the last fiscal year of the previous biennium for the instructional, primary support, and library programs, plus an inflation factor. The inflation factor should be equivalent to the inflation factor used to calculate basic education in the common school system budget request submitted by the governor.

[ 1993 sp.s. c 15 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—Effective date—1993 sp.s. c 15: See notes following RCW 28B.10.776.